Massachusetts, session 194th, S2353.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 6C of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after the words “Ted Williams tunnel” in the
definition of “Metropolitan highway system” the following:- , that portion of state highway route
2 and its related ramps, access roads and frontage roads from the Alewife Brook Parkway
interchange in Cambridge to and including the interchange with Interstate 95 in Lexington, that
portion of Interstate 93 and its related ramps, access roads and frontage roads extending from the
southerly terminus of the Central artery to and including the interchange of Interstate 93 and
Interstate 95 in Canton, that portion of Interstate 93 and its related ramps, access roads and
frontage roads extending from the northerly terminus of the Central artery to and including the
interchange of Interstate 93 and Interstate 95 in Reading, Stoneham and Woburn, that portion of
Interstate 95 and its related ramps, access roads and frontage roads extending from and including
of 5

the interchange of Interstate 95 and Interstate 93 in Canton to and including the interchange of
Interstate 95 and 93 in Reading, Stoneham and Woburn, and that portion of state highway route 1
and its related ramps, access roads and frontage roads extending from the northerly terminus of
the Central artery north area to and including the interchange of Interstate 95 and state highway
route 1 in Peabody.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 6C of the general laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding, after the definition of “Metropolitan highway system revenues” the
following:-
“Metropolitan waterways system”, the comprehensive system of water transportation
extending from Cape Ann to Plymouth Harbor.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 6C of the general laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding, after the definition of “Independent Agencies”, the following definition:-
“Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority assets”, those certain bus, fixed transit,
boat, and rail systems of mass transportation owned, operated or managed by the Massachusetts
Bay Transportation Authority that serve the same transportation routes or geographic area as
those serviced by the Metropolitan highway system. The secretary shall certify which such
assets are deemed to be Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority assets for the purpose of
this section in each edition of the comprehensive transportation plan required pursuant to section
11 of this chapter. The Metropolitan highway system, and the Metropolitan waterways system,
together with the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority assets so certified by the secretary
shall be collectively known as the “Metropolitan transportation network.”
of 5

SECTION 4. Section 13 of chapter 6C of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after subsection (c), the following subsections:-
(d) Not later than December 31, 2025, the department shall develop and shall file with the
joint committee on transportation a plan to implement a comprehensive system of tolling and
travel on and within the metropolitan highway system that shall be consistent with the
requirements of subsection (d) of this section, and shall recognize the interrelationship between
the Metropolitan highway system and the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority assets to
the maximum extent possible.
(e) Not later than July 1, 2026, the department shall develop and begin the
implementation of a comprehensive system of tolling on the Metropolitan highway system which
shall:
(i) be consistent with the Department’s authority as set forth in this chapter;
(ii) establish toll charges that address the operating and capital requirements of the
Metropolitan highway system;
(iii) treat the users of the Metropolitan highway system equitably based on the geographic
origin and destination, mileage and type of asset being used;
(iv) take advantage of all electronic tolling technology;
(v) provide incentives for motorists using the Metropolitan highway system to use the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority assets;
of 5

(vi) implement dynamic or peak period pricing aimed at easing congestion and
maximizing the environmental benefits to the region served by the Metropolitan transportation
network; and
(v) work as a comprehensive transportation system, integrating to the maximum extent
possible, seamless connections, operating schedules, and pricing and fare schedules between
modes of transport making up the Metropolitan transportation network.
(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and on the condition that
the secretary certifies that the Metropolitan highway system is being adequately operated and
maintained, the system of tolling implemented by the department shall permit the use of toll
revenue to be used operate, maintain, repair, replace, enhance and expand, as determined by the
department consistent with the comprehensive state transportation plan required under section 11
of this chapter, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority assets. Any such system shall be
consistent with the obligation of the department to the bondholders of the Metropolitan highway
system.
(g) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department is hereby
authorized and directed to work with the United States department of transportation, the federal
highway administration, the federal railroad administration, the federal transit administration,
and the municipalities, metropolitan planning organizations, regional planning agencies and all
stakeholders within the region served by the Metropolitan transportation system and to take all
action necessary or convenient to implement the requirements of this section.
of 5

SECTION 5. Section 17(a) of chapter 6C of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by deleting subsection (a) and replacing it with the following
subsection:-
(a) The department may provide by resolution at 1 time or from time to time for the
issuance of bonds of the department to relating to the turnpike and the metropolitan highway
system. Any such bonds shall be special obligations of the department payable solely from
monies credited to the fund. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be general obligations
of the commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof and shall not constitute a debt or a
pledge of the faith and credit of the commonwealth or any such political subdivision.
SECTION 6. Section 3 of chapter 161A of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end of section 3 the following subsection:-
(u) To cooperate, notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, with the
department of transportation in the development, implementation, management and operation of
the comprehensive system of assets established as the Metropolitan transportation network under
chapter 6C of the general laws.
of 5